Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6817
Qualified employee leasing company, defined.

Qualified employee leasing company means a company which places all employees of a client-lessee on its payroll and leases such employees to the client-lessee on an ongoing basis for a fee and, by written agreement between the employee leasing company and a client-lessee, grants to the client-lessee input into the hiring and firing of the employees leased to the client-lessee.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 17.